tests/министерство.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах министерство":
    министерство<n><nom> :  министерство 
    министерство<n><gen> :  министерствӑн 
    министерство<n><dat> :  министерствӑна 
    министерство<n><loc> :  министерствӑра 
    министерство<n><abl> :  министерствӑран 
    министерство<n><ins> :  министерствӑпа 
    министерство<n><abe> :  министерствӑсӑр 
    министерство<n><ben> :  министерствӑшӑн
    министерство<n><px1sg><nom> :  министерствӑм 
    министерство<n><px1sg><gen> :  министерствӑмӑн 
    министерство<n><px1sg><dat> :  министерствӑма 
    министерство<n><px1sg><loc> :  министерствӑмра 
    министерство<n><px1sg><abl> :  министерствӑмран 
    министерство<n><px1sg><ins> :  министерствӑмпа 
    министерство<n><px1sg><abe> :  министерствӑмсӑр 
    министерство<n><px1sg><ben> :  министерствӑмшӑн
    министерство<n><px2sg><nom> :  министерству 
    министерство<n><px2sg><gen> :  министерствун 
    министерство<n><px2sg><dat> :  министерствуна 
    министерство<n><px2sg><loc> :  министерствунта 
    министерство<n><px2sg><abl> :  министерствунтан 
    министерство<n><px2sg><ins> :  министерствупа 
    министерство<n><px2sg><abe> :  министерствусӑр 
    министерство<n><px2sg><ben> :  министерствушӑн
    министерство<n><px3sp><nom> :  министерстви 
    министерство<n><px3sp><gen> :  министерствин 
    министерство<n><px3sp><dat> :  министерствине 
    министерство<n><px3sp><loc> :  министерствинче 
    министерство<n><px3sp><abl> :  министерствинчен 
    министерство<n><px3sp><ins> :  министерствипе 
    министерство<n><px3sp><abe> :  министерствисӗр 
    министерство<n><px3sp><ben> :  министерствишӗн
    министерство<n><px1pl><nom> :  министерствӑмӑр 
    министерство<n><px1pl><gen> :  министерствӑмӑрӑн 
    министерство<n><px1pl><dat> :  министерствӑмӑра 
    министерство<n><px1pl><loc> :  министерствӑмӑрта 
    министерство<n><px1pl><abl> :  министерствӑмӑртан 
    министерство<n><px1pl><ins> :  министерствӑмӑрпа 
    министерство<n><px1pl><abe> :  министерствӑмӑрсӑр 
    министерство<n><px1pl><ben> :  министерствӑмӑршӑн
    министерство<n><px2pl><nom> :  министерствӑр 
    министерство<n><px2pl><gen> :  министерствӑрӑн 
    министерство<n><px2pl><dat> :  министерствӑра 
    министерство<n><px2pl><loc> :  министерствӑрта 
    министерство<n><px2pl><abl> :  министерствӑртан 
    министерство<n><px2pl><ins> :  министерствӑрпа 
    министерство<n><px2pl><abe> :  министерствӑрсӑр 
    министерство<n><px2pl><ben> :  министерствӑршӑн
    министерство<n><pl><nom> :  министерствӑсем 
    министерство<n><pl><gen> :  министерствӑсен 
    министерство<n><pl><dat> :  министерствӑсене 
    министерство<n><pl><loc> :  министерствӑсенче 
    министерство<n><pl><abl> :  министерствӑсенчен 
    министерство<n><pl><ins> :  министерствӑсемпе 
    министерство<n><pl><abe> :  министерствӑсемсӗр 
    министерство<n><pl><ben> :  министерствӑсемшӗн
    министерство<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  министерствӑмсем 
    министерство<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  министерствӑмсен 
    министерство<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  министерствӑмсене 
    министерство<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  министерствӑмсенче 
    министерство<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  министерствӑмсенчен 
    министерство<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  министерствӑмсемпе 
    министерство<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  министерствӑмсемсӗр 
    министерство<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  министерствӑмсемшӗн
    министерство<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  министерствусем 
    министерство<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  министерствусен 
    министерство<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  министерствусене 
    министерство<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  министерствусенче 
    министерство<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  министерствусенчен 
    министерство<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  министерствусемпе 
    министерство<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  министерствусемсӗр 
    министерство<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  министерствусемшӗн
    министерство<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  министерствисем 
    министерство<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  министерствисен 
    министерство<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  министерствисене 
    министерство<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  министерствисенче 
    министерство<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  министерствисенчен 
    министерство<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  министерствисемпе 
    министерство<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  министерствисемсӗр 
    министерство<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  министерствисемшӗн
    министерство<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  министерствӑмӑрсем 
    министерство<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  министерствӑмӑрсен 
    министерство<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  министерствӑмӑрсене 
    министерство<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  министерствӑмӑрсенче 
    министерство<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  дмӑрсенчен 
    министерство<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  министерствӑмӑрсемпе 
    министерство<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  министерствӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    министерство<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  министерствӑмӑрсемшӗн
    министерство<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  министерствӑрсем 
    министерство<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  министерствӑрсен 
    министерство<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  министерствӑрсене 
    министерство<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  министерствӑрсенче 
    министерство<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  министерствӑрсенчен 
    министерство<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  министерствӑрсемпе 
    министерство<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  министерствӑрсемсӗр 
    министерство<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  министерствӑрсемшӗн
